Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 271.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Barbering” means engaging in the continuing performance, for compensation, of any of the following activities: cutting, shampooing, or styling hair; shaving the face, shaving around the vicinity of the ears and neckline, or trimming facial hair; facials, skin care, or scalp massages, and bleaching, coloring, straightening, or permanent-waving hair, or similar work by any means, with hands or mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances. Barbering also includes esthetics.

“Cosmetology” means engaging in the continuing performance, for compensation, of any of the following activities:

Work on the hair of any person, including dressing, curling, waving, cleansing, cutting, bleaching, coloring, or similar work by any means, with hands or mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances.

Esthetics.

Manicuring.

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Esthetics” means massaging, cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, beautifying, or otherwise working on the scalp, face, or neck by using cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams. “Esthetics” does not include the sale or application of cosmetics to customers in retail stores or customers’ homes.

“Manicuring” or “nail technician practice” means the nonmedical treatment of a person’s fingernails or toenails or the skin in the vicinity of the nails and includes the use of cosmetic preparations or appliances.

“School of barbering or cosmetology” means a facility or facilities regularly used to train or instruct persons in the practice of barbering or cosmetology.

“Shop” means a facility or facilities regularly used to offer or provide barbering or cosmetology.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 19;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 272.
Prohibitions; offenses.

A person shall not practice or attempt to practice barbering or cosmetology or use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, title, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a barber or cosmetologist unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter.

A person who owns or controls a shop or school of barbering or cosmetology shall not permit the practice of barbering or cosmetology unless the shop or school is registered in accordance with this chapter.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 273.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter regulating barbers and cosmetologists shall not:

affect or prevent the practice of barbering or cosmetology by a student at a school recognized by the Director;

limit or restrict in any manner the right of a practitioner of another licensed profession or occupation from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions incidental to that profession or occupation;

prohibit a licensee from providing barbering or cosmetology services outside a licensed shop so long as those services are limited to only:

patients or residents within a hospital, nursing home, community care home, or any similar facility;

persons who are homebound, disabled, or in a hospice or similar program, or to deceased persons in a funeral home;

persons as part of a special event, provided the sanitation standards expected of licensees in licensed shops are followed;

affect or prevent individuals from serving as make-up artists or hairdressers in the theatrical and performing arts industries;

affect or prevent the practice of barbering or cosmetology outside a registered shop or school by licensees in accordance with rules adopted by the Director;

affect or prevent the practice of barbering or cosmetology within the confines of a State correctional facility by a person incarcerated therein, who has completed training acceptable to the Commissioner of Corrections; or

affect or prevent the practice of natural hair braiding or styling, provided such practice does not involve cutting; the application of chemicals, dyes, or heat; or other changes to the structure of hair.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 20;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 6a;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 274.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.